Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 2
PROBATION

16-11-201. Application for probation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 241, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-201.

L. 82:

(2) amended, p. 308, § 1, effective April 27.

L. 90:

(4) added, p. 941, § 7, effective June 7.

L. 95:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 1281, § 18, effective June 5.

L. 98:

(4)(a)(II) amended, p. 1437, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-201.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-201.5. Purposes of probation.

The purposes of this article 11 with respect to probation are:

To serve as a sentencing option and a response to crime in order to moderate and deter future criminal behavior and victimization;

To support persons in behavior change through the coordination and provision of effective and individualized services that may include, but are not limited to, educational, therapeutic, restorative, and skill-building services;

To hold persons accountable for their behavior through supervision and interventions that promote reparation of harm to the community and victims, which reparation includes, but is not limited to, restitution to victims;

To serve as a cost-effective option for persons appropriate for community supervision; and

To honor the statutory and constitutional rights of victims of crime.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1257), ch. 69, p. 352, § 2, effective April 7.

16-11-202. Probationary power of court. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 242, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-202.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 97, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 739, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 57, § 9, effective March 15.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-202.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-203. Criteria for granting probation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 242, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-203.

L. 76:

IP(1) amended, p. 546, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1)(e) added and (2)(o) repealed, pp. 863, 888, §§ 4, 78, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

16-11-204. Conditions of probation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 243, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-204.

L. 73:

p. 505, § 1.

L. 77:

(1) and (2)(e) amended, p. 863, § 5, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 79:

(2)(e.5) and (2.5) added, p. 601, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(2)(b) amended, p. 309, § 1, effective March 11; (2)(g) amended, p. 253, § 9, effective May 3.

L. 87:

(2)(e) amended, p. 563, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2)(k.5) added, p. 708, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 437, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 455, § 2, effective June 2; (2)(d) and (2.5) amended, p. 211, § 13, effective August 1.

L. 94:

(2)(a)(VI.5) added and (2.5) amended, pp. 1811, 1812, §§ 3, 4, effective June 1; (1) amended, p. 2022, § 2, effective June 3; (2) amended, p. 2036, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2)(a)(V) amended, p. 160, § 1, effective July 1; (2)(a)(V) amended, p. 742, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2)(b)(II) amended, p. 1403, § 55, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 99:

(2.3) added, p. 61, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2)(a)(V) amended, p. 997, § 1, effective May 26; (2)(c) added, p. 234, § 3, effective July 1; (1) and (2.5) amended, p. 1045, § 8, effective September 1.

L. 2001:

(2)(d) added, p. 658, § 5, effective May 30; (4) amended, p. 32, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(2)(c)(I) amended, p. 665, § 9, effective May 28; (2)(a)(V) amended, p. 979, § 2, effective July 1; (2)(d) amended, p. 1183, § 12, effective July 1; (2)(e) added, p. 1150, § 3, effective July 1; (2.5)(i.2), (2.5)(i.4), (2.5)(i.6), and (2.5)(i.8) added, p. 1156, § 17, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

16-11-204.3. Genetic testing as a condition of probation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1580, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1167, § 1, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1146, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 1266, § 4, effective May 26; (1) (b.5) added and (3) amended, p. 1025, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1150, § 4, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 1183, § 13, effective July 1; (1)(b)(I) amended, p. 1495, § 144, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(6) added by revision, pp. 1689, 1693, §§ 4, 17.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2007. (See L. 2006, pp. 1689, 1693.)

16-11-204.5. Restitution as a condition of probation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 863, § 6, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 664, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(3) added, p. 489, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(4) added, p. 630, § 1, effective April 23; (1) amended, p. 628, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 621, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1), (2), and (4) amended and (2.5) added, p. 1778, § 4, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1046, § 9, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-205.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-204.6. Repayment of crime stopper reward as a condition of probation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1812, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-206.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-205. Arrest of probationer - revocation.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2023.] A probation officer may arrest any probationer when:

He has a warrant commanding that the probationer be arrested; or

He has probable cause to believe that a warrant for the probationer's arrest has been issued in this state or another state for any criminal offense or for violation of the conditions of probation; or

Any offense under the laws of this state has been or is being committed by the probationer in his presence; or

He has probable cause to believe that a crime has been committed and the probationer has committed such crime; or

He has probable cause to believe that the conditions of probation have been violated and probable cause to believe that the probationer is leaving or about to leave the state, or that the probationer will fail or refuse to appear before the court to answer charges of violation of the conditions of probation, or that the arrest of the probationer is necessary to prevent physical harm to the probationer or another person or the commission of a crime; or

The probationer, who is on probation as a result of a conviction of any felony except a class 1 felony, has been tested for the illegal or unauthorized use of a controlled substance and the result of such test is positive.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

A probation officer may arrest any probationer when:

(a) The officer has a warrant commanding that the probationer be arrested; or

(b) The officer has probable cause to believe that a warrant for the probationer's arrest has been issued in this state or another state for any criminal offense or for violation of the conditions of probation; or

(c) Any offense pursuant to the laws of this state that is statutorily eligible for arrest has been or is being committed by the probationer in his presence; or

(d) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

(e) The officer has probable cause to believe that the conditions of probation have been violated and probable cause to believe that the probationer is leaving or about to leave the state, or that the probationer will fail or refuse to appear before the court to answer charges of violation of the conditions of probation, or that the arrest of the probationer is necessary to protect the safety of the community or another person or prevent the commission of a crime.

(f) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2023.] If a probation officer has reason to believe that the conditions of probation have been violated by any probationer, he may issue a summons requiring the probationer to appear before the court at a specified time and place to answer charges of violation of the conditions of probation. The summons, unless accompanied by a copy of a complaint, shall contain a brief statement of the violation and the date and place thereof. Failure of the probationer to appear before the court as required by the summons shall be deemed a violation of the conditions of probation.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

Unless any circumstances as provided in subsection (1) or (6.5) of this section exist, when a probation officer has reason to believe that the probationer violated conditions of probation and that a petition for revocation is necessary and appropriate subject to section 16-11-215, the probation officer shall issue a summons requiring the probationer to appear before the court at a specified time and place to answer charges of violation of the conditions of probation. The summons, unless accompanied by a copy of a complaint, shall contain a brief statement of the violation and the date and place thereof. Failure of the probationer to appear before the court as required by the summons shall be deemed a violation of the conditions of probation.

If, rather than issuing a summons, a probation officer makes an arrest, without warrant, of a probationer, the probationer shall be taken without unnecessary delay before the nearest available judge of a court of record. Any probationer so arrested shall have all of the rights afforded by the provisions of this code to persons incarcerated before trial of criminal charges and may be admitted to bail pending probation revocation hearing.

Within seven days after the arrest of any probationer as provided in this section, or within a reasonable time after the issuance of a summons under this section, the probation officer shall complete his or her investigation and either:

File a complaint in the court having jurisdiction of the violation of probation; or

Order the release of the probationer, if imprisoned, and notify the probationer that he is relieved of obligation to appear before the court. In such event, the probation officer shall give written notification to the court of his action.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective until July 1, 2023.] A complaint alleging the violation of a condition of probation may be filed either by the probation officer pursuant to subsection (4) of this section or by the district attorney. Such complaint shall contain the name of the probationer, shall identify the violation charged and the condition of probation alleged to have been violated, including the date and approximate location thereof, and shall be signed by the probation officer or the district attorney. A copy thereof shall be given to the probationer a reasonable length of time before he appears before the court.

(5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (5) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

A complaint alleging the violation of a condition of probation may be filed either by the probation officer pursuant to subsection (4) of this section or by the district attorney. Such complaint must contain the name of the probationer, must identify the violation charged and the condition of probation alleged to have been violated, including the date and approximate location thereof, must include a summary of the violation behavior history and any behavioral responses applied consistent with the structured and individualized behavioral responses developed pursuant to section 16-11-215 and must be signed by the probation officer or the district attorney. A copy thereof must be given to the probationer a reasonable length of time before the probationer appears before the court.

A warrant for the arrest of any probationer for violation of the conditions of probation may be issued by any judge of a court of record upon the report of a probation officer or upon the verified complaint of any person, establishing to the satisfaction of the judge probable cause to believe that a condition of probation has been violated and that the arrest of the probationer is reasonably necessary. The warrant may be executed by any probation officer or by a peace officer authorized to execute warrants in the county in which the probationer is found.

(6.5)

[

Editor's note: This subsection (6.5) is effective July 1, 2023.

]

Unless there is reason to believe that a probationer would not appear, would interfere with the criminal justice process, or poses substantial risk of serious harm to others, a probation officer shall issue a summons rather than request a warrant when filing a petition for revocation.

A person or entity that provides supervision pursuant to section 18-1.3-202 (2), C.R.S., may issue a summons and file a complaint with the court for a defendant under his or her supervision in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 244, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-205.

L. 87:

(5) amended, p. 605, § 6, effective April 6.

L. 89:

(1)(f) added, p. 876, § 11, effective June 5.

L. 2012:

IP(4) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 855, § 86, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(7) added, (SB 16-164), ch. 284, p. 1160, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

(1), (2), and (5) amended and (6.5) added, (HB 22-1257), ch. 69, p. 352, § 3, effective July 1, 2023.

16-11-206. Revocation hearing.

At the first appearance of the probationer in court or at the commencement of the hearing, whichever is first in time, the court shall advise the probationer as provided in section 16-7-207 insofar as such matters are applicable; except that there is no right to a trial by jury in proceedings for revocation of probation.

At or prior to the commencement of the hearing, the court shall advise the probationer of the charges against him and the possible penalties therefor and shall require the probationer to plead guilty or not guilty.

At the hearing, the prosecution has the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence the violation of a condition of probation; except that the commission of a criminal offense must be established beyond a reasonable doubt unless the probationer has been convicted thereof in a criminal proceeding. When, in a revocation hearing, the alleged violation of a condition is the probationer's failure to pay court-ordered compensation to appointed counsel, probation fees, court costs, restitution, or reparations, evidence of the failure to pay shall constitute prima facie evidence of a violation. The court may, when it appears that the alleged violation of conditions of probation consists of an offense with which the probationer is charged in a criminal proceeding then pending, continue the probation revocation hearing until the termination of the criminal proceeding. Any evidence having probative value shall be received regardless of its admissibility under the exclusionary rules of evidence if the defendant is accorded a fair opportunity to rebut hearsay evidence.

If the probationer is in custody, the hearing shall be held within fourteen days after the filing of the complaint, unless delay or continuance is granted by the court at the instance or request of the probationer or for other good cause found by the court justifying further delay.

If the court determines that a violation of a condition of probation has been committed, it shall, within seven days after the said hearing, either revoke or continue the probation. If probation is revoked, the court may then impose any sentence or grant any probation pursuant to the provisions of this part 2 which might originally have been imposed or granted.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 245, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-206.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 664, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(4) and (5) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 855, § 87, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1392, § 34, effective May 25.

16-11-207. Absent violator - arrest and return.

When there is reason to believe that a condition of probation has been violated and the alleged violator is not in the state or cannot be apprehended in the state, the probation officer shall report these facts to the court which granted probation, and the court may forthwith order the issuance of a warrant for the arrest and return of the probationer.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 246, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-207.

16-11-208. Officer's appointment - salary - oath.

Probation officers shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of section 13-3-105, C.R.S., and shall not be removed except for cause.

Before entering upon the duties of his office, each probation officer shall take an oath of office as an officer of the court, as prescribed by law.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 246, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-208.

16-11-209. Duties of probation officers - repeal.

It is the duty of a probation officer to investigate and report upon any case referred to him or her by the court for investigation. The probation officer shall furnish to each person released on probation under his or her supervision a written statement of the conditions of probation and shall instruct the person regarding the same. The officer shall keep informed concerning the conduct and condition of each person on probation under his or her supervision and shall report thereon to the court at such times as it directs. Such officers shall use all suitable methods, not inconsistent with the conditions imposed by the court, to aid persons on probation and to bring about improvement in their conduct and condition. Each officer shall keep records of his or her work; shall make such reports to the court as are required; and shall perform such other duties as the court may direct.

Any probationer, on probation as a result of a conviction, who is under the supervision of a probation officer pursuant to this part 2 and who is initially tested for the illegal or unauthorized use of a controlled substance and the result of such test is positive shall be subject to any or all of the following actions:

An immediate warrantless arrest;

An immediate increase in the level of supervision;

Random screenings for the detection of the illegal or unauthorized use of a controlled substance, which use may serve as the basis for additional punishment or any other community placement;

Referral to a substance use disorder treatment program.

If any probationer described in subsection (2) of this section is subjected to a second or subsequent test for the illegal or unauthorized use of a controlled substance and the result of such test is positive, the probation officer shall take one or more of the following actions:

Make an immediate warrantless arrest;

Seek a probation revocation in accordance with sections 16-11-205 and 16-11-206;

Immediately increase the level of supervision;

Increase the number of drug screenings for the illegal or unauthorized use of controlled substances;

Refer the probationer to a substance use disorder treatment program.

(3.1) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section and this subsection (3.1) are repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Prior to an offender being released from probation, the probation officer releasing the individual shall provide the notice described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4) at the last meeting the officer has with the person.

The notice shall contain the following information:

That a person convicted of certain crimes has the right to seek to have his or her criminal record sealed;

That there are collateral consequences associated with a criminal conviction that a sealing order can alleviate;

The list of crimes that are eligible for sealing and the associated time period that a person must wait prior to seeking sealing;

That the state public defender has compiled a list of laws that impose collateral consequences related to a criminal conviction and that the list is available on the state public defender's website; and

That the person should seek legal counsel if he or she has any questions regarding record sealing.

A probation officer assigned to an individual on probation shall provide information to that individual regarding:

The individual's voting rights;

How the individual may register to vote or update or confirm his or her voter registration record;

How to obtain and cast a ballot; and

How to obtain voter information materials.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 246, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-209.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 876, § 12, effective June 5.

L. 2013:

(4) added, (SB 13-123), ch. 289, p. 1539, § 1, effective May 24; (1), IP(2), (2)(b), and (3)(c) amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1931, § 45, effective October 1.

L. 2017:

(2)(d) and (3)(e) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1298, § 121, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

(5) added, (SB 18-150), ch. 261, p. 1601, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(3.1) added by revision, (HB 22-1257), ch. 69, pp. 354, 362, §§ 4, 14.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

16-11-210. County and juvenile courts.

Any county court or juvenile court in this state may exercise the powers provided for and granted to district courts in this part 2, and the probation officers provided for in this part 2 shall also serve such courts in the same capacity as required by this part 2 for district courts.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 247, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-210.

16-11-211. Interdistrict probation department - personnel.

Any two or more contiguous judicial districts may, by the election of the district judges or a majority of the judges of each district, combine in the formation of an interdistrict probation department; except that such formation shall be approved by the chief justice of the supreme court.

This department, if created, shall have an administrative head who shall be appointed by the judges or the majority of the judges of the districts which comprise the interdistrict probation department, subject to section 13-3-105, C.R.S., and such administrative head shall be the chief probation officer of the department. The department shall consist of such other probation officers as may be appointed, together with such administrative and clerical employees as may be required, as provided pursuant to section 13-3-105, C.R.S.

The chief probation officer shall be charged with the duty of administering the affairs of the department and supervising the probation officers and personnel of the department and conducting the department in accordance with the laws pertaining to probation and the rules of the district courts of the said districts.

Any district which participates in an interdistrict probation department may withdraw from such department by the election of the judges or a majority of the judges of the district and the approval of the chief justice of the supreme court, by giving written notice to the presiding judges of all other judicial districts affected. However, the withdrawal shall not be effective until January 1 of the year following the written notification.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 247, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-211.

16-11-212. Work and education release programs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 247, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-11-212.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 864, § 7, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 79:

(2) amended, p. 601, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1.1) added, p. 497, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 1047, § 10, effective September 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

16-11-213. Intensive supervision probation programs - legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire section added, p. 740, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 93:

(4) amended, p. 718, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(7) added, p. 1276, § 12, effective June 5.

L. 98:

(6) repealed, p. 724, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

In 2002, this section was relocated to section 18-1.3-208.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

16-11-214. Fund created - probation services.

There is created in the state treasury the offender services fund to which must be credited one hundred percent of any cost of care payments or probation supervision fees paid to the state pursuant to section 18-1.3-204 (2)(a)(V) or 19-2.5-1120 and from which the general assembly shall make annual appropriations for administrative and personnel costs for adult and juvenile probation services, as well as for adjunct adult and juvenile probation services in the judicial department, including treatment services; contract services; drug and alcohol treatment services, including continuous alcohol monitoring; and program development, and for associated administrative and personnel costs. Any money remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year does not revert to the general fund.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to the contrary, on April 20, 2009, the state treasurer shall deduct two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the offender services fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to the contrary, on July 1, 2009, the state treasurer shall deduct two million four hundred ninety-eight thousand four hundred thirty-nine dollars from the offender services fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 997, § 2, effective May 26, 2000.)

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 563, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 1096, § 12, effective May 31; entire section amended, p. 160, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 997, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 506, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 980, § 3, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1190, § 36, effective July 1; (1) amended, pp. 1496, 1567, §§ 145, 392, effective October 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(c) added, (SB 09-208), ch. 149, p. 621, § 12, effective April 20; (1)(d) added, (SB 09-279), ch. 367, p. 1926, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2069, § 27, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 713, § 25, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 22-055), ch. 467, p. 3321, § 3, effective August 10.

16-11-215. Structured and individualized behavioral responses - repeal.

Before July 1, 2023, the state court administrator shall develop a system of structured and individualized behavioral responses, including incentives and sanctions, to guide probation officers in determining how best to motivate positive behavior change and the appropriate response to a violation of terms and conditions of probation.

A system of structured and individualized responses must include an accountability-based series of behavioral responses, intermediate sanctions, incentives, and services designed to respond to a probationer's violation of probation quickly, fairly, consistently, and proportionally. The system of structured and individualized responses must also be designed to motivate positive behavior change, successful completion of probation, and a probationer's individual behavioral or treatment goals.

Probation departments shall use the system of structured and individualized behavioral responses developed pursuant to this subsection (3) or develop and use an equivalent and locally developed system that is aligned to best practices.

The state court administrator shall report on the system of structured and individualized responses developed pursuant to this section during the judicial department's annual presentation held pursuant to section 2-7-203 during the 2024 legislative session.

This subsection (4) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1257), ch. 69, p. 354, § 5, effective April 7.